Florida, session 2026, SB192.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 9 10 Section 1.âParagraph (y) of subsection (1) of section 11 460.413, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 12 460.413âGrounds for disciplinary action; action by board or 13 department.â 14 (1)âThe following acts constitute grounds for denial of a 15 license or disciplinary action, as specified in s. 456.072(2): 16 (y)âFailing to preserve identity of funds and property of a 17 patient, the value of which is greater than $501. As provided by 18 rule of the board, money or other property entrusted to a 19 chiropractic physician for a specific purpose, including 20 advances for costs and expenses of examination or treatment 21 which may not exceed the value of $1,500, is to be held in trust 22 and must be applied only to that purpose. Money and other 23 property of patients coming into the hands of a chiropractic 24 physician are not subject to counterclaim or setoff for 25 chiropractic physicianâs fees, and a refusal to account for and 26 deliver over such money and property upon demand shall be deemed 27 a conversion. This is not to preclude the retention of money or 28 other property upon which the chiropractic physician has a valid 29 lien for services or to preclude the payment of agreed fees from 30 the proceeds of transactions for examinations or treatments. 31 Controversies as to the amount of the fees are not grounds for 32 disciplinary proceedings unless the amount demanded is clearly 33 excessive or extortionate, or the demand is fraudulent. All 34 funds of patients paid to a chiropractic physician, other than 35 advances for costs and expenses, shall be deposited into one or 36 more identifiable bank accounts maintained in the state in which 37 the chiropractic physicianâs office is situated, and funds 38 belonging to the chiropractic physician may not be deposited 39 therein except as follows: 40 1.âFunds reasonably sufficient to pay bank charges may be 41 deposited therein. 42 2.âFunds belonging in part to a patient and in part 43 presently or potentially to the physician must be deposited 44 therein, but the portion belonging to the physician may be 45 withdrawn when due unless the right of the physician to receive 46 it is disputed by the patient, in which event the disputed 47 portion may not be withdrawn until the dispute is finally 48 resolved. 49 50 Every chiropractic physician shall maintain complete records of 51 all funds, securities, and other properties of a patient coming 52 into the possession of the physician and render appropriate 53 accounts to the patient regarding them. In addition, every 54 chiropractic physician shall promptly pay or deliver to the 55 patient, as requested by the patient, the funds, securities, or 56 other properties in the possession of the physician which the 57 patient is entitled to receive. 58 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.